Hawaii statutes.
[PART
II.] QUI TAM ACTIONS OR RECOVERY OF

FALSE
CLAIMS TO THE STATE

§661-21 Actions for false claims to the
State; qui tam actions. (a) Notwithstanding section 661-7 to the
contrary, any person who:

(1) Knowingly presents, or causes to be presented, a
false or fraudulent claim for payment or approval;

(2) Knowingly makes, uses, or causes to be made or
used, a false record or statement material to a false or fraudulent claim;

(3) Has possession, custody, or control of property
or money used, or to be used, by the State and, intending to defraud the State
or to wilfully conceal the property, delivers, or causes to be delivered, less
property than the amount for which the person receives a certificate or
receipt;

(4) Is authorized to make or deliver a document
certifying receipt of property used, or to be used by the State and, intending
to defraud the State, makes or delivers the receipt without completely knowing
that the information on the receipt is true;

(5) Knowingly buys, or receives as a pledge of an
obligation or debt, public property from any officer or employee of the State
who is not lawfully authorized to sell or pledge the property;

(6) Knowingly makes, uses, or causes to be made or
used, a false record or statement material to an obligation to pay or transmit
money or property to the State, or knowingly conceals, or knowingly and
improperly avoids or decreases an obligation to pay or transmit money or
property to the State;

(7) Is a beneficiary of an inadvertent submission of
a false claim to the State, who subsequently discovers the falsity of the
claim, and fails to disclose the false claim to the State within a reasonable
time after discovery of the false claim; or

(8) Conspires to commit any of the conduct described
in this subsection,

shall be liable to the State for a civil penalty of
not less than $5,500 and not more than $11,000, plus three times the amount of
damages that the State sustains due to the act of that person.

(b) If the court finds that a person who has
violated subsection (a):

(1) Furnished officials of the State responsible for
investigating false claims violations with all information known to the person
about the violation within thirty days after the date on which the defendant
first obtained the information;

(2) Fully cooperated with any state investigation of
the violation; and

(3) At the time the person furnished the State with
the information about the violation, no criminal prosecution, civil action, or
administrative action had commenced under this title with respect to the
violation, and the person did not have actual knowledge of the existence of an
investigation into the violation;

the court may assess not less than two times the
amount of damages that the State sustains because of the act of the person. A
person violating subsection (a) shall also be liable to the State for the costs
and attorneys' fees of a civil action brought to recover the penalty or
damages.

(c) Liability under this section shall be
joint and several for any act committed by two or more persons.

(d) This section shall not apply to any
controversy involving an amount of less than $500 in value. For purposes of
this subsection, "controversy" means the aggregate of any one or more
false claims submitted by the same person in violation of this part. Proof of
specific intent to defraud is not required.

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Claim" means any request or demand,
whether under a contract or otherwise, for money or property, and whether or
not the State has title to the money or property, that is presented to an
officer, employee, or agent of the State or is made to a contractor, grantee,
or other recipient, if the money or property is to be spent or used on the
State's behalf or to advance a state program or interest, and if the State
provides or has provided any portion of the money or property that is requested
or demanded or will reimburse the contractor, grantee, or other recipient for
any portion of the money or property that is requested or demanded. "Claim"
shall not include requests or demands for money or property that the State has
paid to an individual as compensation for employment or as an income subsidy
with no restrictions on that individual's use of the money or property.

"Knowing" and "knowingly"
means that a person, with respect to information:

(1) Has actual knowledge of the information;

(2) Acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or
falsity of the information; or

(3) Acts in reckless disregard of the truth or
falsity of the information;

and no proof of specific intent to defraud is
required.

"Material" means having the tendency
to influence or capability to influence the payment or receipt of money or
property.

"Obligation" means an established
duty, whether or not fixed, arising from an express or implied contractual,
grantor-grantee, or licensor-licensee relationship, from a fee-based or similar
relationship, from statute, regulation, or administrative rule, or from the
retention of any overpayment. [L 2000, c 126, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 55, §28(1);
am L 2012, c 294, §6]

Case Notes

Defendants' motion for summary judgment granted as to
plaintiffs' claim under the federal and state False Claims Acts (claim analyzed
under the federal Act); there were no genuine issues of material fact as to whether
defendant knowingly submitted false claims to medicare under the "incident
to" rules. 490 F. Supp. 2d 1062 (2007).

Where plaintiffs' qui tam action, brought under the federal
and state False Claims Acts, alleged that defendants submitted false claims to
medicaid, defendants' motion for summary judgment granted; among other things,
defendants did not submit facially false claims. 560 F. Supp. 2d 988 (2008).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next